Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MCGREGOR AIRPORT AUTOMATED WEATHER STATION.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of McGregor to relocate the automated weather station at the McGregor Isedor Iverson Airport. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end